Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
General Corporate Powers

§ 77-9-141.
Powers, rights and privileges of railroad corporations.

Except as limited, or otherwise prescribed, by valid federal statutes or lawful regulations made thereunder, every railroad corporation, organized under the provisions of this article, shall have and exercise the powers, rights and privileges set forth in Sections 77-9-143 through 77-9-183.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3577; 1906, § 4079; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6708; 1930, § 6072; 1942, § 7723.

§ 77-9-143.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

[Codes, 1892, § 3578; 1906, § 4080; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6709; 1930, § 6073; 1942, § 7724.]

§ 77-9-145.
Suing; having a common seal.

To sue and be sued, to plead and to be impleaded, and to have and use a common seal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3579; 1906, § 4081; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6710; 1930, § 6074; 1942, § 7725.

§ 77-9-147.
Building and operating railroad.

To build and construct, and thereafter to use, operate, own, sell, and enjoy the railroad as specified and defined in the application of the projectors for its creation and organization, with one or more tracks, and to construct and operate such branches, spurs, and laterals thereto as may be necessary or proper to develop the country through which its main line may extend. Upon the location of branches, spurs, or laterals, the company shall file in the Office of the Secretary of State a written statement showing the line thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3580; 1906, § 4082; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6711; 1930, § 6075; 1942, § 7726.

§ 77-9-149.
Collecting charges for transportation of persons and property.

To charge and collect reasonable compensation for the transportation of persons and property on its road.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3580; 1906, § 4082; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6711; 1930, § 6075; 1942, § 7726.

§ 77-9-151.
Issuing stocks and bonds.

To issue any part of its stock as preferred stock, and to fix the relative rights of common and preferred stock, and to issue such bonds and obligations as it may from time to time determine.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3582; 1906, § 4084; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6713; 1930, § 6077; 1942, § 7729.

§ 77-9-153.
Increasing capital stock; issuing preferred stock to satisfy obligations.

To increase, from time to time, its capital stock, but never to exceed the amounts actually expended by the railroad company in constructions, completions, equipments, and additions to its railroad and property; a stockholder shall not be liable for the debts of the corporation beyond the sum due for unpaid subscriptions.

To issue preferred stock and fix the face value of each share at such amount as shall be determined by the board of directors, for the purpose of satisfying, paying and retiring the outstanding bonds, notes, secured or unsecured, or any other evidence of obligations of any kind or character, which obligations have been or shall be incurred by the railroad corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3581; 1906, § 4083; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6712; 1930, § 6076; 1942, § 7727; Laws, 1938, ch. 347.

§ 77-9-155.
Determining number of directors, officers and agents; prescribing compensation, duties and terms thereof.

To determine the number of directors, and of officers and agents under them, and to fix the compensation and prescribe the duties of each, and the terms of office of each.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3583; 1906, § 4085; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6714; 1930, § 6078; 1942, § 7730.

§ 77-9-157.
Authorizing appointment of executive committee.

To authorize the directors to appoint an executive committee, with full power to act in their stead and place at all times when they are not in session.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3584; 1906, § 4086; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6715; 1930, § 6079; 1942, § 7731.

§ 77-9-159.
Opening books of subscription; calling stockholders’ meetings.

To open books of subscription for the capital stock of the company, and to call meetings of the stockholders for the election of directors and the performance of such other business as may be proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3585; 1906, § 4087; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6716; 1930, § 6080; 1942, § 7732.

§ 77-9-161.
Mortgaging; securing mortgage bonds.

To mortgage or convey in trust, from time to time, any or all of its property, real, personal, and mixed, then owned or thereafter to be acquired, and also all or any of its rights, powers, privileges, liberties, immunities, or franchises, whether then owned, possessed, and enjoyed or thereafter to be acquired, including its right to be a corporation; and under such deed or deed in trust or mortgage, to secure, execute, and dispose of the mortgage bonds of the company to such amounts and maturing at such times and bearing such lawful interest as it may deem best; and to secure, in like manner or in any other way, the bonds and obligations of any other railroad company.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3586; 1906, § 4088; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6717; 1930, § 6081; 1942, § 7733.

§ 77-9-163.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

[Codes, 1892, § 3587; 1906, § 4089; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6718; 1930, § 6082; 1942, § 7734.]

§ 77-9-165.
Leasing railroad and its properties.

To lease, except to parallel or competing lines, its railroad and all of its property and franchises, rights, powers, privileges, and immunities then owned or thereafter to be acquired, for a term of years, and to lease, except from parallel or competing lines, other railroads, in or out of this state for a term of years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3588; 1906, § 4090; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6719; 1930, § 6083; 1942, § 7735.

§ 77-9-167.
Doing an express or telegraph business.

To do an express business over its own line or lines of railroad; to acquire and put up, use, and operate a line or lines of telegraph along its lines; and to acquire, hold, and enjoy all such property as may be proper, necessary, or convenient in doing such express or telegraph business.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3589; 1906, § 4091; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6720; 1930, § 6084; 1942, § 7736.

§ 77-9-169.
Having right of way generally.

To enter upon all lands, and to survey, lay out, and construct a railroad thereon. However, before so doing, it must contract and agree with the owner upon the price to be paid for the land or its use, or with the administrator, executor, or guardian in case the owner be dead, be an infant, or person of unsound mind. If an agreement cannot be made it must condemn and acquire the same by the exercise of the right of eminent domain as provided in Chapter 27, Title 11, of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3591; 1906, § 4093; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6722; 1930, § 6086; 1942, § 7738.

§ 77-9-171.
Having right of way over state lands.

To enter upon, acquire, and enjoy a right of way over and across any lands belonging to the state, the same not to exceed in width one hundred (100) feet, and the same not to be appropriated or used except when the actual construction of the road has reached such state lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3590; 1906, § 4092; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6721; 1930, § 6085; 1942, § 7737.

§ 77-9-173.
Entering upon land adjacent to its right of way.

To enter upon land adjacent to its right of way for the purpose of making, or repairing, or changing the railroad, and to cut, quarry, dig, take, and carry away any stone, wood, gravel, earth, or other materials which may be necessary. However, in all such cases it shall make compensation to the owner as agreed upon, or upon condemnation as provided in Chapter 27, Title 11, of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3592; 1906, § 4094; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6723; 1930, § 6087; 1942, § 7739.

§ 77-9-175.
Acquiring lands for depots and other purposes.

To agree and contract for the acquisition of, or to exercise the right of eminent domain to condemn, lands necessary for depots or other necessary and proper purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3593; 1906, § 4095; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6724; 1930, § 6088; 1942, § 7740.

§ 77-9-177.
Crossing, intersecting, joining or uniting with other railroads.

To cross, intersect, join, or unite its railroad with any other railroad heretofore or hereafter constructed at any points on its route, and upon the ground of such other railroad company, with the necessary and proper turnouts, sidings, switches, and other conveniences, and to exercise the right of eminent domain for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3594; 1906, § 4096; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6725; 1930, § 6089; 1942, § 7741.

§ 77-9-179.
Crossing water courses.

To construct, maintain, or operate its railroad under, over, and across any and all streams or bodies of water, whether navigable or not, which lie along or across its route, and to erect, use, and maintain bridges over the same; however, whenever a navigable stream or body of water is crossed by a bridge, there shall be maintained a draw or swing in the bridge sufficient to allow the passage of boats and water craft; and to establish such transfers, landings, wharves, approaches, and inclines as may be convenient or necessary in transferring by boat or other water craft its freight, passengers, cars, and rolling stock, loaded or unloaded, upon and across any river or body of water; and to own, use, operate, and control, of itself or with others, all such steamboats, transfer boats, ferries, or water craft, as are or may be convenient in crossing such water or plying therein so as to develop trade over its line of railroad.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3595; 1906, § 4097; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6726; 1930, § 6090; 1942, § 7742.

§ 77-9-181.
Insuring persons and property.

To insure persons and property, or either, transported or to be transported over its railroad, and all property coming or about to come into its possession or control for the purpose of transportation or incident thereto, or for storage in any of its depots, storage houses or wharves.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3596; 1906, § 4098; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6727; 1930, § 6091; 1942, § 7743.

§ 77-9-183.
General grant of powers.

To do and perform all and everything necessary to the exercise of the powers expressed in this article, and to the accomplishment of the objects of its creation and organization, including the exercise of the right of eminent domain as provided in Chapter 27, Title 11, of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3597; 1906, § 4099; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6728; 1930, § 6092; 1942, § 7744.

§ 77-9-185.
How powers are to be exercised.

The powers conferred in Sections 77-9-141 through 77-9-183 are to be exercised by a board of directors and the officers, agents, and employees under them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3598; 1906, § 4100; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6729; 1930, § 6093; 1942, § 7745; Laws, 1938, ch. 347.

§ 77-9-187.
Terminal points and direction of line may be changed.

A railroad company chartered under this article may, after beginning the construction of its road, make all necessary or proper changes in its course or direction from that specified in the application for its incorporation, and may, with the consent of the Public Service Commission, change its terminal point.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3599; 1906, § 4101; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6730; 1930, § 6094; 1942, § 7746.

§ 77-9-189.
Adoption and change of gauge.

All railroads hereafter constructed in this state may adopt such gauge for their respective roads as the stockholders may determine.

Any railroad company, the gauge of whose road is not the standard, may change the gauge to the standard gauge whenever a majority of the capital stock of the company, voted at any regular meeting of the stockholders, may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1064; 1892, §§ 3570, 3571; 1906, §§ 4071, 4072; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6700, 6701; 1930, §§ 6095, 6096; 1942, §§ 7747, 7748.

§ 77-9-191.
Fictitious stock is void.

A railroad corporation shall not issue stocks or bonds except for money, labor done or in good faith agreed to be done, or property actually received. Any fictitious increase of stock or indebtedness shall be void.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3600; 1906, § 4102; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6731; 1930, § 6100; 1942, § 7752.

§ 77-9-193.
Powers of stockholders.

The board of directors is to be subject to the stockholders of the railroad company, who may meet as often as they shall determine. The stockholders may remove any or all of the directors from office, elect others, and vacate and annul any by-laws, order, or rule established or ordinance passed by the directors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3598; 1906, § 4100; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6729; 1930, § 6093; 1942, § 7745; Laws, 1938, ch. 347.